Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 10 Department of Finance and Administration
4-3-1021. Monitoring and auditing of pharmacy benefits manager's compliance with state pharmacy benefits management contract.

The department of finance and administration shall monitor, and cause to be audited by its qualified independent auditor, the pharmacy benefits manager's compliance with any state pharmacy benefits management contract. The commissioner of finance and administration, or the commissioner's designee, shall report, by July 1 of each year, on the pharmacy benefits manager's contract compliance to the speaker of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives and the fiscal review committee.

In order to comply with subsection (a), the department shall, after one (1) year of entering into or renewing any state pharmacy benefits management contract, annually perform a single risk assessment to determine those areas of the contracts that pose the greatest risk of noncompliance, fraud, waste and abuse. Upon completion of the risk assessment, the department shall incorporate the results of the risk assessment into its audit and monitoring plan. The department shall update the risk assessment when contract amendments result in additional risks of noncompliance, fraud, waste, or abuse. The department shall consult with the office of the comptroller of the treasury in determining the scope and extent of the audit and monitoring plan procedures. The department may submit the updated audit and monitoring plan, along with any audit or monitoring findings, to comply with the reporting requirement in subsection (a).

The audit and monitoring plan shall address all state pharmacy benefits management contracts and be designed to examine source documentation whenever such documentation is available. The plan shall include, but not be limited to, a review of:

Repricing of pharmacy claims at the drug level;

Validation of the national drug code (NDC) usage;

Appropriateness of the nationally recognized reference prices, or average wholesale price (AWP), in accordance with § 56-7-3104;

Eligibility of beneficiaries for pharmacy claims paid;

For pharmacy benefits contracts entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2013, reconciliation of the pharmacy benefits manager's payments to pharmacies with the state's reimbursement to the pharmacy benefits manager;

Confirmation that the pharmacy benefits manager's payments to pharmacies do not reflect disparity among network pharmacies attributable to preferential treatment of one (1) or more pharmacies;

Recalculation of discount and dispensing fee guarantees;

Review of the state's claim utilization to ensure that per claim rebate guarantees were accurately calculated by the pharmacy benefits manager;

Review of rebate contracts between the pharmacy benefits manager and five (5) drug manufacturers, to be selected by the benefits administration division of the department, and the contracted auditor to ensure that eligible rebate utilization was accurately invoiced on behalf of the state;

Comparison of total rebates collected by the PBM (pass-through rebates) to the minimum rebate guarantees (per claim rebates) to ensure that annual reconciliation of rebate payments to the state represented the greater of the two (2) amounts;

Monitor the activities of the pharmacy benefits manager to ensure that the contractor is conducting audits and other reviews of pharmacies as provided in the contractor's scope of services; and

Consideration of other industry related risks to reduce the risk of financial losses due to fraud, waste and abuse.

The department shall seek appropriate remedies for contract noncompliance and occurrences of fraud, waste or abuse that are discovered through monitoring or audits.

The department shall have the authority to contract with a qualified independent auditor experienced in conducting pharmacy audits for auditing the pharmacy benefits manager's compliance with the contract. No contracted qualified independent auditor shall subcontract any part of the plan described in this section without the express written approval by the commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, and notification in writing to the comptroller of the treasury.

This section shall apply to any state or local health insurance plan established under title 8, chapter 27.

Acts 2013, ch. 408, § 1.

4-3-1022. Control of state portal — E-commerce payment activity assessment — Annual report — Liability for underlying obligation.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall have the responsibility for the overall management of the state's portal, which shall include the following:

The commissioner may authorize the assessment of additional charges on e-commerce payment activity to recover the costs of delivering e-commerce services, accepting electronic payments online, or both and shall be responsible for the development and administration of the policy guidelines governing such charges. The guidelines shall be consistent with federal laws and regulations governing electronic payment transactions. Such additional charges shall only be assessed when an optional method of payment is available. In no event shall such charges exceed the actual costs incurred to deliver e-commerce services and accept electronic payments online; and

The review of the chief information officer's annual report concerning the operation of the state's portal.

No person making a payment to the department by credit card, debit card, or other similar financial transaction card shall be relieved from liability for the underlying obligation, except to the extent that the department realizes final payment of the underlying obligation in cash or the equivalent. If final payment is not made by the card issuer or other guarantor of payment, then the underlying obligation shall survive, and the department shall retain all remedies for enforcement that would have applied if the transaction had not occurred.

Acts 2016, ch. 880, § 1.